Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB363.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Legislative findings.The General Assembly hereby finds and declares as follows:(1) Rosh Hashanah, the Jewish New Year, marks the beginning of the High Holidays and signifies a time for reflection and celebration.(2) Yom Kippur, the Day of Atonement, is the holiest day in Judaism, representing the apex of the High Holidays season, and is dedicated to prayer, fasting and introspection.(3) Eid al-Fitr, the Festival of Breaking the Fast, commemorates the end of Ramadan, a month of fasting for Muslims, and is celebrated with prayers, feasts and acts of 1234567891011121314151617 charity.(4) Eid al-Adha, the Festival of Sacrifice, is considered one of holiest holidays in the Islamic calendar and is similarly celebrated through prayers and acts of service.(5) This Commonwealth was founded on the principles of religious freedom and tolerance, and these holidays, celebrated by many Pennsylvanians, deserve official recognition.Section 2. Designations.(a) Jewish tradition.--In accordance with longstanding Jewish tradition:(1) The secular calendar date coinciding with the first day of the Hebrew month of Tishri in any given year shall be designated as the beginning of Rosh Hashanah in this Commonwealth.(2) The secular calendar date coinciding with the tenth day of the Hebrew month of Tishri shall be designated as the observance of Yom Kippur in this Commonwealth.(b) Islamic tradition.--In accordance with longstanding Islamic tradition:(1) The first day of the Islamic month of Shawwal shall be designated as the beginning of Eid al-Fitr in this Commonwealth.(2) The tenth day of the Islamic month of Dhu al-Hijjah shall be designated as the beginning of Eid al-Adha in this Commonwealth.Section 3. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed as requiring an employer to treat a day designated under section 2 as a legal or 20250HB0363PN0319 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 official holiday or to provide paid leave to an employee on a day designated under section 2 solely by virtue of the date being designated under this act.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0363PN0319 - 3 - 12345